Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1907
Complaints to office; form; full investigation; when; notice.

(1) Complaints to the office may be made in writing. A complaint shall be evaluated to determine if it alleges possible misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or violation of a statute or of rules and regulations of the department by an employee of or a person under contract with the department or a private agency. All complaints shall be evaluated to determine whether a full investigation is warranted.

(2) The office shall not conduct a full investigation of a complaint unless:

(a) The complaint alleges misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or violation of a statute or of rules and regulations of the department;

(b) The complaint is against a person within the jurisdiction of the office; and

(c) The allegations can be independently verified through investigation.

(3) After receipt of a complaint, the Inspector General shall determine whether the office will conduct a full investigation.

(4) When a full investigation is opened on a private agency that contracts with the department, the Inspector General shall give notice of such investigation to the department.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-907;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 51.